California statutes. Education Code
 Certification. Local educational agencies receiving an allocation of funds pursuant to this paragraph are encouraged to use these funds over the full grant period, through June 30, 2031. For purposes of allocations and apportionments under this paragraph, a locally funded charter school shall be included with the chartering authority.

(3) On or before June 30, 2025, and again on or before June 30, 2028, a recipient local educational agency receiving funds pursuant to this section shall submit an interim report to the department, and a final report on or before June 30, 2031, detailing how it used funds awarded pursuant to this subdivision. The
 department shall use the existing reporting template described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 53008.5 for the purposes of this requirement. Specifically, these reports shall include all of the following:

(A) How funds were used to employ literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists for its eligible schools.

(B) How funds were used to develop and implement school literacy programs.

(C) How expenditures impacted pupils’ literacy achievement, including for pupil subgroups.

(D) How the local educational agency plans to continue to fund literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists beyond the award period.

(E) Other metrics as determined by the department.

(4) On or before July 30, 2025, again on or before July 30, 2028, and again on or before July 30, 2032, the department shall provide the interim and final reports submitted by recipient local educational agencies to the grantee selected pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53008.5 for the independent evaluation pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section.

(5) On or before December 31, 2025, again on or before December 31, 2028, and again on or before December 31, 2032, the department shall
 provide a comprehensive report to the Department of Finance, the state board, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature summarizing the data collected pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subdivision and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 53008.5.

(c) (1) Of the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a), two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be available to the grantee selected pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53008.5 to provide additional training for educators to become literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists, consistent with the training developed for the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant program pursuant to Section 53008.5 and to contract for an independent evaluation pursuant to paragraph (4).

(2) The grantee selected pursuant to paragraph (1) shall do all of the
 following:

(A) Consider the preparation program standards set by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing for reading and literacy in developing the standards for educator training developed pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) Offer professional learning to educators at schoolsites funded pursuant to subdivision (b) and, as capacity allows, to other schoolsites.

(C) Provide funding for participating educators to pursue a Reading and Literacy Added Authorization, a Reading and Literacy Leadership Credential, a Bilingual Specialist Authorization, or any combination of those.

(3) Resources and training for literacy developed pursuant to this subdivision shall be coordinated with other state- and federally funded literacy initiatives to reduce duplication of
 effort and provide coordinated, streamlined access to literacy professional development and resources for educators and school leaders that are aligned with the curriculum framework for English Language Arts/English Language Development adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60207, the English Learner Roadmap, the Literacy Roadmap, and the use of data to support effective instruction.

(4) The grantee selected pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53008.5 shall, in consultation with, and subject to the approval of, the executive director of the state board and the department, issue a request for proposals and contract for an independent evaluation of the effectiveness of the funding provided pursuant to this section, as well as the funding appropriated pursuant to Section 53008.5. The grantee shall use up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of the funding appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) for the independent evaluation.

(5) The evaluation conducted pursuant to paragraph (4) shall include an examination of the following:

(A) Data collected from recipient local educational agencies pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section and subdivision (b) of Section 53008.5, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) How funds were used to employ literacy coaches and reading and literacy specialists.

(ii) How funds were used to develop and implement school literacy programs.

(iii) How expenditures impacted pupils’ literacy achievement, including for pupil subgroups.

(iv) How the local educational agencies plan to continue to fund literacy
 coaches and reading and literacy specialists beyond the award period.

(B) How the trainings developed and provided by the grantee selected pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53008.5 impacted the training of literacy coaches and literacy and reading specialists.

(6) On or before December 31, 2032, the grantee selected pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 53008.5 shall provide the evaluation report to the chairs of the relevant policy committees and budget subcommittees of the Legislature, the executive director of the state board or their designee, the department, and the Director of Finance.

(d) For purposes
 of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Eligible schoolsite” means an elementary schoolsite operated by a local educational agency with an unduplicated pupil percentage of 95 percent or greater for pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, based on 2022–23 Fall 1 census day pupil data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System that did not receive funding pursuant to Section 53008.5. The unduplicated pupil percentage for a schoolsite shall be calculated by the sum of the number of unduplicated pupils eligible for free and reduced-price meals, English language learners, and youth in foster care, divided by each schoolsite’s total enrollment for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(2) “Local educational agency” means an elementary or unified school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(3) “School” and “schoolsite” means an elementary school of a local educational agency.

(4) “School literacy program” means a program that includes all of the following:

(A) A school literacy plan that includes goals and actions to improve literacy acquisition for pupils in preschool, if applicable, and kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive. The plan shall identify metrics to measure progress toward the goals and actions.

(B) At least one literacy coach or reading and literacy specialist per school to support educators and pupils in improving literacy instruction and pupil outcomes.

(C) Increased access to evidence-based literacy instruction through strategies, including, but not
 limited to, any of the following:

(i) Providing bilingual reading specialists to support dual language acquisition and English language development programs.

(ii) Developing and implementing culturally responsive curriculum and instruction.

(iii) Providing professional development for educators and school leaders in literacy instruction and the use of data to identify and support struggling pupils.

(iv) Providing professional development for educators and school leaders regarding implementation of the curriculum framework for English language arts and English language development adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60207 and the use of data to support effective instruction.

(v) Establishing an evidence-based family literacy initiative, which may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Family literacy plans that identify literacy and biliteracy goals, benchmarks, and roles for all family members.

(II) Family literacy home visiting programs, including, but not limited to, “promotora” family literacy outreach specialists. Local educational agencies may establish literacy and biliteracy home visits to engage families in how to best support their pupils and every family member in reaching their literacy goals.

(III) Extended-day, summer, or weekend family institutes related to literacy and biliteracy. Local educational agencies are encouraged to work with in-house expanded learning programs to establish literacy and biliteracy support programs and literacy
 enrichment programs during after school, weekend, and summer hours.

(IV) Public library family literacy partnerships, including, but not limited to, digital tools to support whole family literacy.

(e) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 25.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

53009.

(a) The sum of two hundred fifteen million dollars ($215,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department to augment the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program established in Sections 53008.5 and 53008.7. Funds appropriated for this purpose are available for encumbrance through June 30, 2031.

(b) (1) Of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a), two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be allocated by the department to local educational agencies for eligible schoolsites to develop school literacy programs, including dual language immersion and other programs for multilingual learners, employ and develop literacy coaches and specialists, and develop and implement interventions for pupils in
 need of targeted literacy support, including English learners. A local educational agency may opt not to participate in the program pursuant to this subdivision by informing the department, by September 30, 2025, using a form provided by the department, of the local educational agency’s intent to decline program funds for their eligible schoolsites and the local educational agency. A local educational agency that receives funding pursuant to this section may also be eligible for the Reading and Literacy Supplementary Authorization Incentive Grant Program.

(2) The department shall allocate funding under paragraph (1) based on an amount per pupil enrolled in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive, at each eligible schoolsite, except that no local educational agency shall receive less than four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) per eligible schoolsite. Grant amounts shall be determined using 2024–25 school enrollment data
 determined as of the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 Certification. For purposes of allocations and apportionments under this paragraph, a locally funded charter school shall be included with the chartering authority.

(3) A local educational agency receiving grant funding pursuant to this subdivision is encouraged to use these funds over the full grant period, through June 30, 2031.

(4) On or before June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2031, respectively, a recipient local educational agency shall submit an interim and final report to the department detailing how it used funds awarded pursuant to this subdivision using a reporting template developed by the department for the purposes of this requirement. Specifically for literacy, the report shall include all of the following:

(A) How funds were
 used to employ literacy coaches and specialists for its eligible schoolsites.

(B) How funds were used to develop, improve, and expand upon school literacy programs, including English Language Development and dual language immersion programs, and other programs for multilingual learners.

(C) How expenditures impacted pupils’ literacy achievement, including achievement of high need pupil groups.

(D) How the local educational agency plans to continue to fund literacy coaches and reading and literacy and bilingual specialists past the award period.

(E) Other metrics as determined by the department.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Eligible schoolsite” means a schoolsite with an unduplicated pupil percentage of 94 percent or greater for pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, based on 2024–25 Fall 1 census day pupil data submitted through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System that did not receive funding pursuant to Section 53008.5 or 53008.7. The unduplicated pupil percentage for a schoolsite shall be calculated by dividing the sum of the number of unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02, by each schoolsite’s total enrollment for kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(B) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(C) “School literacy program” means a program that includes all of the following:

(i) A school literacy plan that includes goals and actions to improve literacy acquisition for all pupils, including those needing targeted literacy support, in preschool, if applicable, and kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive. The plan shall identify metrics to measure progress towards the goals and actions.

(ii) At least one literacy coach or specialist per schoolsite to support educators and pupils in improving literacy instruction and pupil outcomes. The literacy coach or specialist may serve educators and pupils schoolwide, beyond grade 3.

(iii) Increased access to evidence-based literacy instruction, through strategies, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Providing professional learning for educators and school
 leaders regarding implementation of the curriculum framework for English Language Arts/English Language Development adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60207, the English Learner Roadmap, the Literacy Roadmap, and the use of data to support effective instruction. This may include supporting educators in obtaining Reading and Literacy Leadership Specialist Credentials, Reading and Literacy Added Authorizations, and Bilingual Specialist Authorizations.

(II) Providing English language development and bilingual education specialists to support language development for multilingual learners.

(III) Providing professional development for educators and school leaders in literacy instruction and the use of data to identify and support struggling pupils.

(IV) Establishing an evidence-based family literacy
 initiative, which may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(ia) Family literacy plans that identify literacy and biliteracy goals, benchmarks, and roles for all family members.

(ib) Family literacy home visiting programs, including, but not limited to, “promotora” family literacy outreach specialists. A local educational agency may establish literacy and biliteracy home visits to engage families in how to best support their pupils and every family member in reaching their literacy goals.

(ic) Extended-day, summer, or weekend family institutes related to literacy and biliteracy. A local educational agency shall be encouraged to work with in-house expanded learning programs to establish literacy and biliteracy support programs and literacy enrichment programs during after school, weekend, and summer
 hours.

(id) Public library family literacy partnerships, including, but not limited to, digital tools to support whole family literacy.

(D) “Schoolsite” means an elementary school operated by a local educational agency.

(c) (1) Of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a), fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available for the department, subject to the approval of the executive director of the state board, to select a county office of education or a consortium of county offices of education with expertise in both literacy instruction and multilingual education, through a competitive process, to provide training for educators to become literacy coaches and provide credentialing opportunities for educators to become reading and literacy and bilingual specialists, working with
 professional development providers, including, but not limited to, the California Reading and Literature Project, the California Writing Project, and other experts specializing in multilingual education. The department shall prioritize applicants with demonstrated success in improving literacy instruction and outcomes through dual language immersion and other programs for multilingual learners, through professional development based on the English Language Arts/English Language Development Framework adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60207, the English Learner Roadmap adopted by the state board, and the Literacy Roadmap, especially for English learners and other high-need pupil groups and for those planning on partnering with institutions of higher education with demonstrated success in providing statewide professional development for expert literacy practice for multilingual learners.

(2) The selected county office of education or
 a consortium of county offices of education shall do all of the following:

(A) Consider the preparation program standards set by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing for reading and literacy in developing the standards for educator training developed pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) Offer professional learning to educators at schoolsites funded pursuant to subdivision (b) and, as capacity allows, to other schoolsites.

(C) Provide funding for participating educators to pursue a Reading and Literacy Added Authorization, a Reading and Literacy Leadership Credential, a Bilingual Specialist Authorization, or any combination of those.

(3) Resources and training for literacy developed pursuant to this subdivision shall be coordinated with other state- and
 federally funded literacy initiatives to reduce duplication of effort and provide coordinated, streamlined access to literacy professional development and resources for educators and school leaders that are aligned with the curriculum framework for English Language Arts/English Language Development adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60207, the English Learner Roadmap, the Literacy Roadmap, and the use of data to support effective instruction.

(4) Of the amount made available to the department pursuant to paragraph (1), one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be available to the selected county office of education or consortium of county offices of education to contract for an independent evaluation of their training and dissemination of literacy coaches and specialists under this chapter.

(5) On or before July 30, 2028, and again on or before July 30, 2031, the department shall provide the interim and final reports submitted by recipient local educational agencies to the grantee selected pursuant to paragraph (1) for an independent evaluation pursuant to paragraph (4).

(6) On or before December 31, 2028, and again on or before December 31, 2032, the department shall provide a comprehensive report to the Department of Finance, the state board, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature summarizing the data collected pursuant to this section.

(d) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount appropriated from the General Fund in subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school
 districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 26.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

53009.1.

(a) (1) The sum of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department to augment the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program established in Sections 53008.5, 53008.7, and 53009. Funds appropriated for this purpose are available for encumbrance through June 30, 2031.

(2) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (1), one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be allocated by the department to local educational agencies to supplement existing recipient funding pursuant to Section 53008.5 to extend the Literacy Coach and Reading Specialists Grant Program through June 30, 2031.
 For purposes of this paragraph, the definitions in subdivision (d) of Section 53008.5 shall apply.

(3) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (1), one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be allocated by the department to local educational agencies to supplement existing recipient funding pursuant to Section 53008.7 to extend the Literacy Coach and Reading Specialists Grant Program through June 30, 2031. For purposes of this paragraph, the definitions in subdivision (d) of Section 53008.7 shall apply.

(4) Of the amount
 appropriated in paragraph (1), one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be allocated by the department to local educational agencies to supplement existing recipient funding pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 53009, to extend the Literacy Coach and Reading Specialists Grant Program through June 30, 2031. For purposes of this paragraph, the definitions in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 53009 shall apply.

(b) (1) Funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used to develop and sustain school literacy programs, including English language development and dual language immersion programs, and other programs for multilingual learners.

(2) A local educational agency may opt not to participate in the grant
 extension pursuant to this section by informing the department, by September 30, 2026, using a form provided by the department, of the local educational agency’s intent to decline additional program funds for their eligible schoolsites and the local educational agency.

(A) A schoolsite that was awarded funding pursuant to Section 53008.5, 53008.7, or 53009 that has ceased operation by July 1, 2026, shall not be awarded additional funding under this section.

(B) A local educational agency that
 receives funding pursuant to this or other programs for multilingual learners, employs and develops literacy coaches and specialists, and develops and implements interventions for pupils in need of targeted literacy support may also be eligible for the Reading and Literacy Supplementary Authorization Incentive Grant Program.

(3) The department shall allocate funding under paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a)
 proportionate to the grant amounts received by local educational agencies for each eligible schoolsite pursuant to Sections 53008.5, 53008.7, and 53009. For purposes of allocations and apportionments under this paragraph, a locally funded charter school shall be included with the chartering authority.

(4) A local educational agency receiving grant funding pursuant to subdivision (a) is encouraged to use these funds over the full grant period, through June 30, 2031.

(5) On or before June 30, 2031, a recipient local educational agency shall submit a report to the department detailing how it used funds awarded pursuant to subdivision (a) using a reporting template developed by the department for the purposes of this requirement. The
 report shall include all of the following:

(A) How funds were further used to employ literacy coaches and specialists for recipient schoolsites.

(B) How funds were used to develop, improve, and expand upon school literacy programs, including comprehensive English language development and dual language immersion programs, and other programs for multilingual learners.

(C) How expenditures impacted pupils’ literacy and biliteracy achievement, including achievement of high need pupil groups.

(D) How the local educational agency plans to continue to fund literacy coaches and reading and literacy and bilingual specialists past the award period.

(E) Other metrics as determined by the
 department.

(c) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal
 year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 27.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

53009.5.

(a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for allocation to local educational agencies that administer literacy screenings to pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 and 2 for risk of reading difficulties to support implementation of the requirements of Section 53008 of the Education Code, in the manner specified in this section.

(b) The Superintendent shall make the following computations in order to determine the amount of funding for each local educational agency:

(1) (A) Determine the total number of pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 and 2, but
 excluding pupils in transitional kindergarten, attending school in that local educational agency using the prior year’s school enrollment data as of the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 Certification.

(B) Calculate a statewide total number of pupils by adding the total number of pupils identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) across all local educational agencies.

(2) Calculate a per-pupil rate by dividing the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) by the statewide total number of pupils identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).

(3) Calculate the apportionment for each local educational agency by multiplying the per-pupil rate calculated in paragraph (2) by the number determined in paragraph (1) for the local educational agency.

(c) The governing board or body of a local educational agency serving pupils in kindergarten or grade 1 or 2 shall expend the funds received pursuant to this section on any costs associated with the implementation of Section 53008 of the Education Code, including, but not limited to, the procurement of screening instruments, screening administration, and training for school employees to administer pupil screenings in kindergarten and grades 1 and 2, but excluding transitional kindergarten, in order to assess for risk of reading difficulties using screening instruments approved pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 53008.

(d) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in
 subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII   B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(e) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 119.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. California Career Pathways Trust [53010. - 53016.]

53010.

The California Career Pathways Trust is hereby established as a state education and economic and workforce development initiative with the goal of preparing pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, to successfully transition to postsecondary education and training and to employment in high-skill, high-wage, and high-growth or emerging sectors of the state’s economy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 32, Sec. 41.   (SB 858)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

53011.

Contingent upon funding provided for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the department shall administer the California Career Pathways Trust as a competitive grant program for kindergarten and grades 1 to 14, inclusive. Funds appropriated in Item 6110-280-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2014 shall be available for expenditure in the 2014–15 fiscal year to the 2016–17 fiscal year, inclusive. Recipients shall do all of the following:

(a) Prioritize work-based learning opportunities, as defined in Section 51760.1, for pupils and students in partnership with regional business and industry, state and local governmental entities, and nonprofit and community-based organizations.

(b) Define the labor market of the regional economy in a manner that identifies high-skill, high-wage, high-growth jobs in the current regional economy or in emerging economic sectors.

(c) Establish or strengthen existing regional collaborative relationships and partnerships among business entities, schools serving pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and postsecondary educational agencies, organizations that provide apprenticeship opportunities, and nonprofit or government entities.

(d) Develop and integrate standards-based academics with a career-relevant, sequenced curriculum following industry-themed pathways that are aligned to high-skill, high-wage, high-growth jobs in the current regional economy, or in emerging regional economic sectors.

(e) Provide articulated pathways from high
 school to postsecondary education and training that are aligned with the workforce development needs of regional economies.

(f) Ensure that career pathway programs are designed and implemented in a manner that leads students to a postsecondary degree or certification in a high-skill, high-wage, and high-growth or emerging field.

(g) Leverage and build on any of the following:

(1) Existing structures, requirements, and resources of the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Improvement Act of 2006, California Partnership Academies, and Regional Occupational Centers and Programs.

(2) The California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program.

(3) Matching resources
 and in-kind contributions from public, private, and philanthropic sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 13, Sec. 35.   (AB 104)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

53012.

A grant recipient under this chapter may be a school district, county office of education, direct-funded charter school, regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority, or community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 687, Sec. 7.   (SB 876)   Effective September 27, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

53013.

The following are conditions of receipt of California Career Pathways Trust funds:

(a) A grant recipient shall not use the funds to supplant other funding from state, federal, or any other public or private sources that would otherwise be used in the absence of funding provided by a California Career Pathways Trust grant.

(b) A grant recipient shall identify and set aside funding within its own budget and obtain funding commitments from program partners sufficient to support the ongoing costs of the program for multiple years following the expiration of grant funding pursuant to this chapter.

(c) A grant recipient subject to the requirements of Sections 52060 and 52061, Sections 52066 and 52067, or Section 47606.5 shall ensure that the activities supported by the California Career Pathways Trust funds are in alignment with the priorities and activities of the grant recipient’s local control and accountability plan.

(d) A grant recipient subject to the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 52302 shall ensure that the activities supported by the California Career Pathways Trust funds are in alignment with the elements of the plan identified in that section.

(e) A grant recipient shall annually collect and submit data on outcome measures to the department, which shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Pupil and student academic performance indicators.

(2) The number and rate of school or program graduates.

(3) Attainment of certificates, transfer readiness, and postsecondary enrollment.

(4) Transitions to appropriate employment, apprenticeships, or job training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 32, Sec. 41.   (SB 858)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

53014.

The Superintendent shall consult with the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, state workforce investment organizations, and organizations representing business in the development of the request for grant applications and in the consideration of grant applications under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 32, Sec. 41.   (SB 858)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

53015.

For purposes of administering the California Career Pathways Trust, the Superintendent may do any of the following:

(a) Establish a structure for awarding grants on a regional or local basis as defined by the Superintendent.

(b) Determine specific funding amount categories and the number of grants to be awarded in each category.

(c) Distribute funding on a multiyear schedule, and establish a process for monitoring the use of the funding, and, if necessary, cease distribution of funding and recover previously distributed funding in the case of a recipient’s failure to comply with a grant award
 condition.

(d) Require grant recipients to submit program reports pursuant to a schedule determined by the Superintendent.

(e) Set aside up to 1 percent of the total amount provided for in the trust for one or both of the following purposes:

(1) To provide planning grants.

(2) To contract with a local educational agency for the provision of technical assistance to applicants and grant recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 32, Sec. 41.   (SB 858)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

53016.

For purposes of considering competitive priorities for the California Career Pathways Trust, the Superintendent shall do all of the following:

(a) Consider how to prioritize grants to applicants in regions with higher-than-state-average rates of high school dropouts as measured by the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.

(b) Provide special consideration to an applicant or applicants seeking to establish or strengthen legal career pathways and promote a better understanding of the role and operations of state and federal courts and their relationship to the other branches of government.

(c) Provide special consideration to an applicant or applicants seeking to establish or strengthen career pathways that include both high school opportunities and at least one of the following significant postsecondary pathways: a degree pursuant to Section 78041, if that section is added by Senate Bill 850 of the 2013–14 Regular Session of the Legislature, or an EdPrize apprenticeship opportunity pursuant to Section 33135.5, if that section is added by Senate Bill 923 of the 2013–14 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 32, Sec. 41.   (SB 858)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16.1. Golden State Pathways Program [53020. - 53025.]

53020.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Golden State Pathways Program Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 88.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

53021.

The Golden State Pathways Program is hereby established to do all of the following:

(a) Promote pathways in high-wage, high-skill, high-growth areas, including, but not limited to, technology, health care, education, including early education and child development, and climate-related fields that allow pupils to advance seamlessly from high school to college and career and, provide the workforce needed for economic growth.

(b) Encourage collaboration between local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, local and regional employers, and other relevant community interest holders to develop, or expand the availability of, innovative college and career pathways that simultaneously
 align with a local educational agency’s local or regional labor market needs.

(c) Enable more pupils to access postsecondary education opportunities and workforce training opportunities, or to obtain gainful employment in an industry that simultaneously aligns with local, regional, or state labor market needs.

(d) Support the continued development of a skilled and educated workforce, with an emphasis on addressing areas of acute statewide need, such as developing a diverse workforce to meet the need for professional and learning support positions in childcare settings, preschools, and schools maintaining prekindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 88.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

53022.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “High-priority local educational agency” means a local educational agency that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) Fifty percent or more of the enrolled pupils at the local educational agency are unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02.

(2) The local educational agency has a higher than state average dropout rate.

(3) The local educational agency has a higher than state average rate of suspension and a higher than state average rate of expulsion.

(4) The local educational agency has higher than state average rates of child homelessness, foster youth, or justice-involved youth.

(5) The local educational agency has a lower than state average rate of pupils completing all of the A–G courses required to be eligible for admission to the University of California or the California State University.

(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, county office of education, or regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority or county office of education.
